Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
PROCLAMATION

By The
STATE BOARD OF ELECTION SUPERVISORS

Office of State Board of Election Supervisors, Little Rock, Ark., October 30, 1874.

In pursuance of the provisions of section seventeen of the schedule to the Constitution recently framed for the State of Arkansas, the undersigned do hereby proclaim and make known that at a general election held on the thirteenth day of October, A. D. 1874, the following votes were cast “For” and “Against” said Constitution in the several counties of said State, as appears by the official returns made to said board by the county boards of election supervisors, to-wit:

[Here follows a tabulation of the vote by counties.] Total Vote “For Constitution”
78,697 Total Vote “Against Constitution”
24,807
Majority “For Constitution”
53,890 Given under our hands this thirtieth day of October, 1874. U. M. ROSE, DUDLEY E. JONES, GORDON N. PEAY, State Board of Election Supervisors.

Click to view form.